Maryland, session 2026, HB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–912.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every passenger car and station
wagon, except as otherwise provided in this part, is a Class A (passenger) vehicle.
(b) [For] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
each Class A (passenger) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of 3,500 pounds or
less:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1379*

HOUSE BILL 1379
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $70.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $80.50;
(2) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,500
pounds but not more than 3,700 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $80.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $85.50; and
(3) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,700
pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $121.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $151.50.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A CLASS A (PASSENGER) VEHICLE
OWNED BY A RESIDENT OF AND REGISTERED TO AN ADDRESS IN THE SIXTH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(2) FOR EACH CLASS A (PASSENGER) VEHICLE, THE ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE IS:
(I) FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MANUFACTURER’S SHIPPING
WEIGHT OF 3,500 POUNDS OR LESS, $30.50;
(II) FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MANUFACTURER’S SHIPPING
WEIGHT OF MORE THAN 3,500 POUNDS BUT NOT MORE THAN 3,700 POUNDS, $35.50;
AND
(III) FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MANUFACTURER’S SHIPPING
WEIGHT OF MORE THAN 3,700 POUNDS, $101.50.
13–915.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every motorcycle is a Class D
(motorcycle) vehicle.
(b) [For] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
each Class D (motorcycle) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $55.00; and

HOUSE BILL 1379 3
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $65.00.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A CLASS D (MOTORCYCLE)
VEHICLE OWNED BY A RESIDENT OF AND REGISTERED TO AN ADDRESS IN THE SIXTH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(2) FOR EACH CLASS D (MOTORCYCLE) VEHICLE, THE ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE IS $15.00.
13–916.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every single unit truck with two or
more axles is a Class E (truck) vehicle.
(b) (1) [For] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
FOR each Class E (truck) vehicle, the annual registration fee is based on the maximum
gross weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles, as follows:
Maximum Gross Weight Fee (per 1,000 Pounds
Limit (in Pounds) or Fraction Thereof)
10,000 (minimum) – 18,000 $9.00
18,001 – 26,000 11.75
26,001 – 40,000 12.75
40,001 – 60,000 14.75
60,001 – 80,000 (maximum) 16.00
(2) (i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the annual
registration fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $45.00.
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $75.00.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE THAT
IS:
(I) DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) OWNED BY A RESIDENT OF AND REGISTERED TO AN
ADDRESS IN THE SIXTH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(2) THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE FOR A CLASS E (TRUCK)
VEHICLE IS DECREASED BY $50.
13–917.

HOUSE BILL 1379
(A) [Notwithstanding] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, AND NOTWITHSTANDING § 13–916(b) of this subtitle, for any Class E (truck)
vehicle with a manufacturer’s rated capacity of 3/4 ton or less and a maximum gross vehicle
weight of 7,000 pounds or less, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a maximum gross vehicle weight of 3,500 pounds or
less:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75;
(2) Except as provided in item (4) of this section, for a vehicle with a
maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 3,500 pounds but not more than 5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $93.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $98.75;
(3) Except as provided in item (4) of this section, for a vehicle with a
maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $108.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $138.75; and
(4) For a vehicle, regardless of the vehicle’s maximum gross vehicle weight,
for which the owner certifies on the registration application that the vehicle for which the
application is made will be used for construction activities:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE THAT
IS:
(I) DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) OWNED BY A RESIDENT OF AND REGISTERED TO AN
ADDRESS IN THE SIXTH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING § 13–916(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, FOR ANY
CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE WITH A MANUFACTURER’S RATED CAPACITY OF 3/4 TON
OR LESS AND A MAXIMUM GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT OF 7,000 POUNDS OR LESS, THE
ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE IS:

HOUSE BILL 1379 5
(I) FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MAXIMUM GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT
OF 3,500 POUNDS OR LESS, $43.75;
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MAXIMUM GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT OF MORE THAN 3,500
POUNDS BUT NOT MORE THAN 5,000 POUNDS, $48.75;
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
FOR A VEHICLE WITH A MAXIMUM GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT OF MORE THAN 5,000
POUNDS, $88.75; AND
(IV) FOR A VEHICLE, REGARDLESS OF THE VEHICLE’S MAXIMUM
GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT, FOR WHICH THE OWNER CERTIFIES ON THE
REGISTRATION APPLICATION THAT THE VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE APPLICATION IS
MADE WILL BE USED FOR CONSTRUCTION ACTIVITIES, $43.75.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) When a bridge built over the Patapsco River to replace the collapsed Francis
Scott Key Bridge opens to general vehicular traffic, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, this Act shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
(b) The Maryland Transportation Authority shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services within 5 days of the Francis Scott Key Bridge reopening to general
vehicular traffic.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.